Utah statutes.
17-18a-403.   Appeal.

(1)  A public prosecutor shall assist and cooperate, as required by the attorney general, in a case that may be appealed to the Court of Appeals or Utah Supreme Court regarding a criminal violation of state statute.

(2)  A public prosecutor shall appear and prosecute all appeals, in the appropriate court, for a crime charged as a misdemeanor in district court or as a violation of a county criminal ordinance.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

